District of Columbia statutes.
6-1035

Procedures of the Commission.

(a)

The Director of the Department, or the Director’s designee, shall convene the first meeting of the Commission during December 2002; provided, that at least 5 appointments have been made to the Commission.

(b)

The Commission shall meet at least once a month, at a time and place to be determined by the Chairperson. The Chairperson may call additional meetings.

(c)

A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum.

(d)

An audio or written transcript shall be kept of all meetings at which a vote is taken.

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1145, 49 DCR 6968

History